test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-4lex_puhelin_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

  
  Noun - puhelin: # ok
    puhelin+N+Sg+Nom: puhelin
    puhelin+N+Sg+Gen: puhelin
    puhelin+N+Sg+Acc: puhelin
    puhelin+N+Sg+Ill: puhelimân
    puhelin+N+Sg+Loc: puhelimist
    puhelin+N+Sg+Com: puhelimáin
    puhelin+N+Sg+Abe: puhelinttáá
    puhelin+N+Ess: puhelimin
    puhelin+N+Par: puhelimid
    puhelin+N+Pl+Nom: puhelimeh
    puhelin+N+Pl+Gen: puhelimij
    puhelin+N+Pl+Acc: puhelimijd
    puhelin+N+Pl+Ill: puhelimáid
    puhelin+N+Pl+Loc: puhelimijn
    puhelin+N+Pl+Com: [puhelimijguin, puhelimijgijn]
    puhelin+N+Pl+Abe: puhelimijttáá

  Noun - luistin: # ok
    luistin+N+Sg+Nom: luistin
    luistin+N+Sg+Gen: luistin
    luistin+N+Sg+Acc: luistin
    luistin+N+Sg+Ill: luistimân
    luistin+N+Sg+Loc: luistimist
    luistin+N+Sg+Com: luistimáin
    luistin+N+Sg+Abe: luistinttáá
    luistin+N+Ess: luistimin
    luistin+N+Par: luistimid
    luistin+N+Pl+Nom: luistimeh
    luistin+N+Pl+Gen: luistimij
    luistin+N+Pl+Acc: luistimijd
    luistin+N+Pl+Ill: luistimáid
    luistin+N+Pl+Loc: luistimijn
    luistin+N+Pl+Com: [luistimijguin, luistimijgijn]
    luistin+N+Pl+Abe: luistimijttáá
